Maryland, session 2025, SB0025.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
9–109.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “CUSTODY EVALUATOR” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL
APPOINTED OR APPROVED BY A COURT TO PERFORM A CUSTODY EVALUATION.
(B) ON MOTION OF A PARTY OR CHILD’S COUNSEL, OR ON ITS OWN
INITIATIVE, A COURT MAY:
(1) ORDER AN ASSESSMENT TO AID THE COURT IN EVALUATING THE
HEALTH, SAFETY, AND WELFARE OR BEST INTERESTS OF A CHILD IN A CONTESTED
CUSTODY OR VISITATION CASE; OR
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0025*

SENATE BILL 25
(2) APPOINT A CUSTODY EVALUATOR DETERMINED BY THE COURT TO
BE COMPETENT TO PERFORM A HOME STUDY OR AN EVALUATION OF A SPECIFIC
ISSUE.
(C) A COURT MAY NOT ORDER THE COST OF AN ASSESSMENT TO BE PAID, IN
WHOLE OR IN PART, BY A PARTY WITHOUT GIVING THE PARTIES NOTICE AND AN
OPPORTUNITY TO OBJECT.
(D) A COURT MAY NOT APPOINT AN INDIVIDUAL AS A CUSTODY EVALUATOR
UNLESS THE INDIVIDUAL MEETS THE QUALIFICATIONS SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTIONS
(E) AND (F) OF THIS SECTION.
(E) A CUSTODY EVALUATOR SHALL BE:
(1) A PHYSICIAN LICENSED IN ANY STATE WHO IS
BOARD–CERTIFIED IN PSYCHIATRY OR HAS COMPLETED A PSYCHIATRY RESIDENCY
ACCREDITED BY THE ACCREDITATION COUNCIL FOR GRADUATE MEDICAL
EDUCATION OR A SUCCESSOR TO THAT COUNCIL;
(2) A MARYLAND LICENSED PSYCHOLOGIST OR A PSYCHOLOGIST
WITH AN EQUIVALENT LEVEL OF LICENSURE IN ANY OTHER STATE;
(3) A MARYLAND LICENSED CLINICAL MARRIAGE AND FAMILY
THERAPIST OR A CLINICAL MARRIAGE AND FAMILY THERAPIST WITH AN
EQUIVALENT LEVEL OF LICENSURE IN ANY OTHER STATE;
(4) A MARYLAND LICENSED CERTIFIED SOCIAL
WORKER–CLINICAL OR A CLINICAL SOCIAL WORKER WITH AN EQUIVALENT LEVEL
OF LICENSURE IN ANY OTHER STATE;
(5) (I) A MARYLAND LICENSED GRADUATE OR MASTER SOCIAL
WORKER WITH AT LEAST 2 YEARS OF EXPERIENCE IN:
1. ONE OR MORE OF THE AREAS LISTED IN SUBSECTION
(F)(4) OF THIS SECTION;
2. PERFORMING CUSTODY EVALUATIONS; OR
3. ANY COMBINATION OF THE EXPERIENCE DESCRIBED
IN ITEM 1 OR 2 OF THIS ITEM; OR
(II) A GRADUATE OR MASTER SOCIAL WORKER WITH AN
EQUIVALENT LEVEL OF LICENSURE AND EXPERIENCE IN ANY OTHER STATE; OR

SENATE BILL 25 3
(6) A MARYLAND LICENSED CLINICAL PROFESSIONAL COUNSELOR
OR A CLINICAL PROFESSIONAL COUNSELOR WITH AN EQUIVALENT LEVEL OF
LICENSURE IN ANY OTHER STATE.
(F) A CUSTODY EVALUATOR SHALL HAVE:
(1) COMPLETED A TRAINING PROGRAM THAT CONFORMS WITH
GUIDELINES ESTABLISHED BY THE ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICE OF THE COURTS;
(2) COMPLIED WITH THE CONTINUING EDUCATIONAL
REQUIREMENTS OF THE CUSTODY EVALUATOR’S FIELD;
(3) TRAINING OR EXPERIENCE IN OBSERVING OR PERFORMING
CUSTODY EVALUATIONS; AND
(4) CURRENT KNOWLEDGE AND EXPERIENCE IN DEALING WITH
ALLEGATIONS IN THE FOLLOWING AREAS:
(I) DOMESTIC VIOLENCE;
(II) CHILD NEGLECT AND ABUSE;
(III) TRAUMA AND ITS IMPACT ON CHILDREN AND ADULTS;
(IV) FAMILY CONFLICT AND DYNAMICS;
(V) CHILD AND ADULT DEVELOPMENT; AND
(VI) THE IMPACT OF DIVORCE AND SEPARATION ON CHILDREN
AND ADULTS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.